Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2633YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 729 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 307.19 Railway tracks overpass and 1 underpass fund. 2 1. A railway tracks overpass and underpass fund is created 3 in the state treasury under the control of the department. The 4 fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the fund. 5 2. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 6 to distribute in the form of grants to cities and counties 7 to assist with the construction of highway overpasses and 8 underpasses across railway tracks. 9 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 10 or earnings on moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited 11 to the fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 12 shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year. 13